Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.160

Award, how paid into court.

Whenever the attorney general shall file with the director of financial management a certificate setting forth the amount of any award found against the state of Washington under the provisions of RCW 8.04.010 through 8.04.160, together with the costs of said proceeding, and a description of the lands and premises sought to be appropriated and acquired, and the title of the action or proceeding in which said award is rendered, it shall be the duty of the office of financial management to forthwith issue a warrant upon the state treasury to the order of the attorney general in a sum sufficient to make payment in money of said award and the costs of said proceeding, and thereupon it shall be the duty of said attorney general to forthwith pay to the clerk of said court in money the amount of said award and costs.

[ 1979 c 151 s 8; 1973 c 106 s 8; 1891 c 74 s 10; RRS s 900.]